District of Columbia statutes.
50-2421.03

Unlawful acts.

It shall be a violation of Chapter 23 of this title for any person to park, leave unattended, or store:

(1)

An abandoned or dangerous vehicle on public space;

(2)

Any motor vehicle on private property without the consent of the property owner; or

(3)

An abandoned or dangerous vehicle on private property, even with the consent of the property owner, unless the vehicle is:

(A)

Kept in a lawful enclosed structure or building completely shielded from the view of individuals on the adjoining properties; or

(B)

Lawfully stored or kept on the property of a business engaged in the lawful repair, storage, salvage, or disposal of vehicles.

Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 3, 50 DCR 6579
This section is referenced in § 50-2421.02, § 50-2421.04, § 50-2421.05, § 50-2421.07, and § 50-2421.09.
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 3 of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).